Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4019.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “permit” has the meaning given that term in ORS
183.700.
(2) This section applies to the following agencies:
(a) The Department of Environmental Quality.
(b) The Department of Transportation.
(c) The Department of State Lands.
(d) The State Department of Energy.
(e) The State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
(3)(a) In considering an application for a permit, an agency listed in subsection (2) of this
section may require the submission of plans, specifications and corrections and revisions
thereto and other reasonable information that it considers necessary to determine that the
application is complete and that the applicant is eligible for the permit. Except when other-
wise required by state statute or federal law, an agency listed in subsection (2) of this section
shall base approval or denial of an application for a new permit on the rules and standards
that are applicable at the time that the agency determines the application is complete.
(b) This section does not limit an agency’s authority to incorporate newly applicable re-
quirements when considering an application for renewal of a permit, or when changes in
operations by the applicant after receiving a permit require the application of new require-
ments.
(c) This section does not prohibit an agency from offering an applicant the opportunity
to comply with new rules and standards for a permit application after the application is
complete.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 185

HB 4019

[2]